apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="h/aber__vaux">  <!-- this is only for generation. however I keep also the forms with LR restriction in case the "standard"  generated forms should be changed  -->
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>aber<s n="vaux"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ei</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>aber<s n="vaux"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>é</l>         <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abe</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abé</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ub</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="indefi_vid/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>úb</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="indefi_vid/e__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abe</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abé</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aig</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ay</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aig</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ay</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pis_ese__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pis_ese__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aig</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ay</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aig</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ay</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/etz__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="inf_er__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="ger_endo__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ubi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="ger_endo__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>

    

<e r="RL" lm="haber">    <i>h</i><par n="h/aber__vaux"/></e>
